Rhode Island statutes. Title 17 Elections
Chapter 9 Registration of Voters [Repealed.]

17-9-1 — 17-9-27.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 7, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 7, §§ 7, 20; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 1; P.L. 1920 ch. 1867, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 6, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 7, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 310, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 312, § 21; P.L. 1951 (s.s.), ch. 2870, §§ 2, 3, 4, 9, 10, 101/2, 12, 13, 16, 17, 21, 26, 27, 29; P.L. 1952, ch. 2897, §§ 1, 4, 5; P.L. 1953, ch. 3205, §§ 1 — 3; G.L. 1956 §

17-6-4

; G.L. 1956, §§

17-9-1

— 17-9-25; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 122, § 1; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1960, ch. 118, § 1; P.L. 1963, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1963, ch. 209, § 3; P.L. 1964, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, § 5; P.L. 1966, ch. 201, § 1; P.L. 1972, ch. 152, § 2; P.L. 1974, ch. 232, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 24, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 107, §§ 1, 2; P.L. 1978, ch. 201, § 6; P.L. 1978 ch. 246, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 250, §§ 1 — 3; P.L. 1980, ch. 309, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 172, § 4; P.L. 1984, ch. 144, §§ 1, 2; P.L. 1984, ch. 308, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 335, § 4; P.L. 1987, ch. 282, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 293, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 376, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 440, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 274, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 391, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 3, effective January 1, 1995. For present comparable provisions, see chapter 9.1 of this title.